Utah statutes.
17-18a-404.   Juvenile proceedings.

For a proceeding involving a charge of juvenile delinquency, a public prosecutor shall appear and prosecute for the state in the juvenile court of the county.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

